Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3132
Program administration; Department
of Health and Human Services; implement requirements; report.

The Department
of Health and Human Services shall fulfill the requirements of sections 81-3127
to 81-3131 by September 1, 2012. The department shall train community-based
organizations by September 1, 2012. The department shall report back to the
Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature by September 15, 2012,
regarding the implementation of sections 81-3127 to 81-3131, including, but
not limited to, the reasons for the department's determinations of the appropriate
number of staff and hours pursuant to section 81-3128 and the number of community-based
organization contracts pursuant to section 81-3131.

Laws 2012, LB825, § 6.